Florida, session 2026, SB1042.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 42 43 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 373.118, Florida 44 Statutes, is amended to read: 45 373.118âGeneral permits; delegation.â 46 (4)(a)âThe department shall adopt by rule one or more 47 general permits for local governments to construct, operate, and 48 maintain public mooring fields, public boat ramps, including 49 associated courtesy docks, and associated parking facilities 50 located in uplands. Such general permits adopted by rule shall 51 include provisions to ensure compliance with part IV of this 52 chapter, subsection (1), and the criteria necessary to include 53 the general permits in a state programmatic general permit 54 issued by the United States Army Corps of Engineers under s. 404 55 of the Clean Water Act, Pub. L. No. 92-500, as amended, 33 56 U.S.C. ss. 1251 et seq. A facility authorized under such general 57 permits is exempt from review as a development of regional 58 impact if the facility complies with the comprehensive plan of 59 the applicable local government. Such facilities shall be 60 consistent with the local government manatee protection plan 61 required pursuant to chapter 379. Mooring fields authorized 62 under such general permits may not exceed 100 vessels. All 63 facilities permitted under this section shall be constructed, 64 maintained, and operated in perpetuity for the exclusive use of 65 the general public. The department is authorized to have 66 delegation of authority from the Board of Trustees of the 67 Internal Improvement Trust Fund to issue leases for mooring 68 fields that meet the requirements of such general permits. The 69 department shall initiate the rulemaking process within 60 days 70 after the effective date of this act. 71 (b)âNotwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a 72 county, municipality, or special district may not apply for a 73 permit to establish or maintain a mooring field outside of its 74 territorial boundaries. Notwithstanding any provision of law to 75 the contrary, a county may not apply for a permit to establish 76 or maintain a mooring field within an incorporated area. This 77 paragraph does not apply to a mooring field that has been 78 approved by all jurisdictional local governments or that has 79 been issued a final, nonappealable permit by the department 80 before December 31, 2025. 81 Section 2.âSection 514.023, Florida Statutes, is amended to 82 read: 83 514.023âSampling of beach waters; and public bathing 84 places; health advisories and signage.â 85 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âbeach watersâ means 86 the waters along the coastal and intracoastal beaches and shores 87 of this the state, and includes salt water and brackish water. 88 (2)âThe department shall may adopt and enforce rules to 89 protect the health, safety, and welfare of persons using the 90 beach waters and public bathing places of this the state. The 91 rules must: 92 (a)âEstablish health standards and prescribe procedures and 93 timeframes for bacteriological sampling of beach waters and 94 public bathing places. 95 (b)âRequire owners of beach waters and public bathing 96 places to notify the department within 24 hours after a test 97 result indicates that a sample of the beach waters or water in a 98 public bathing place fails to meet standards established by the 99 department. 100 (c)âPrescribe minimum sanitation standards relating to 101 discharge that is disposed of in beach waters or the water at a 102 public bathing place. 103 (3)âA county, municipality, or special district, or the 104 state if the affected beach waters and public bathing places are 105 owned by this state, must The department may issue, within 24 106 hours after a sampling or the next business day, whichever 107 occurs first, health advisories if the quality of beach waters 108 or a public bathing place fails to meet standards established by 109 the department. The issuance of health advisories related to the 110 results of bacteriological sampling of beach waters is preempted 111 to the state. 112 (4)(a)âWhen a county, municipality, or special district, or 113 the state if the affected beach waters and public bathing places 114 are owned by this state, the department issues a health advisory 115 against swimming in beach waters or a public bathing place on 116 the basis of finding elevated levels of fecal coliform, 117 Escherichia coli, or enterococci bacteria in a water sample, the 118 department shall concurrently notify the municipality or county, 119 municipality, or special district in which the affected beach 120 waters or public bathing places are located, or the state, 121 whichever has jurisdiction, must notify, within 24 hours after a 122 sampling or the next business day, whichever occurs first, and 123 the local office of the Department of Environmental Protection 124 and the local affiliates of national television networks in the 125 affected area, of the advisory. 126 (b)âThe county, municipality, or special district, or the 127 state if the affected beach waters and public bathing places are 128 owned by this state, in which the affected beach waters or 129 public bathing place is located must close the beach waters or 130 public bathing places that fail to meet the departmentâs 131 standards if a closure is deemed necessary to protect the 132 health, safety, and welfare of the public. A closure remains in 133 effect until the quality of the beach waters or public bathing 134 place is restored and complies with the departmentâs standards 135 and until the county, municipality, special district, or state, 136 as applicable, has removed any related health advisories that it 137 issued. 138 (5)âWithin 24 hours after the incident or the next business 139 day, whichever occurs first: 140 (a)âA county, municipality, or special district shall 141 notify the department of any incident that makes the water 142 quality of beach waters or public bathing places within its 143 jurisdiction unsafe. 144 (b)âAn owner of a public boat dock, marina, or pier shall 145 notify the appropriate county, municipality, or special district 146 of any incident that makes the water quality of the beach waters 147 in which the public dock, marina, or pier is located unsafe. 148 (6)âThe local office of the Department of Environmental 149 Protection shall promptly investigate wastewater treatment 150 facilities located within 1 mile of the affected beach waters or 151 public bathing place to determine whether if a facility 152 experienced an incident that may have contributed to the 153 contamination and provide the results of the investigation in 154 writing or by electronic means to the municipality or county, 155 municipality, or special district, as applicable. 156 (7)(a)âThe department shall adopt by rule a health advisory 157 sign that must be posted in certain locations when a county, 158 municipality, special district, or the state issues a health 159 advisory against swimming in affected beach waters or public 160 bathing places due to elevated levels of fecal coliform, 161 Escherichia coli, or enterococci bacteria in the water. The 162 department shall coordinate with the Department of Environmental 163 Protection and the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission as 164 necessary to implement the signage requirements in this 165 subsection. 166 (b)âThe health advisory sign must be at least 16.5 inches 167 by 30 inches in size. 168 (c)âThe county, municipality, or special district in which 169 the affected beach waters or public bathing place is located is 170 responsible for posting and maintaining the health advisory 171 signs around the affected beach waters and public bathing places 172 owned by the county, municipality, or special district. 173 (d)âThe Department of Environmental Protection is 174 responsible for posting and maintaining the health advisory 175 signs around the affected beach waters and public bathing places 176 owned by this state. 177 (e)âA health advisory sign must be posted at each beach 178 access point and in conspicuous areas around the affected beach 179 waters or public bathing place. A health advisory sign must 180 remain posted until subsequent testing of the water demonstrates 181 that the bacteria levels meet the standards established by the 182 department and the health advisory is no longer in effect. 183 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.